da: Kajakkens skrogdesign: Fortrængning; Flad bund; Hybrid; Multi-knækspant; Planende; Ponton; Afrundet; Tunnel; V-formet; Andet
sl-SI: Zasnova trupa kajaka: Izpodrivni; Ravno dno; Hibridni; Večrobni; Drsni; Pontonski; Zaobljeni; Tunelski; V-oblika; Drugo
hr-HR: Dizajn trupa kajaka: Deplasmanski; Ravno dno; Hibridni; Višestruki prijelomi; Gliserski; Pontonski; Zaobljeni; Tunelski; V-oblik; Ostalo
tr: Kayak gövde tasarımı: Deplasman; Düz taban; Hibrit; Çoklu çene; Planya; Duba; Yuvarlak; Tünel; V şeklinde; Diğer
lt-LT: Baidarės korpuso dizainas: Vandenį išstumiantis; Plokščiadugnis; Hibridinis; Kelių briaunų; Glisuojantis; Pontoninis; Apvalus; Tunelinis; V formos; Kita
fr: Forme de la coque du kayak: À déplacement; À fond plat; Hybride; À bouchains multiples; Planante; Ponton; Arrondie; À tunnel; En V; Autre
es: Diseño del casco de kayak: Desplazamiento; Fondo plano; Híbrido; Multichine; Planeo; Pontón; Redondeado; Túnel; En forma de V; Otro
ro-RO: Designul corpului caiacului: De deplasament; Fund plat; Hibrid; Gurnă multiplă; Glisare; Ponton; Rotunjit; Tunel; În formă de V; Altele
zh-CN: 皮划艇船体设计: 排水型; 平底; 混合型; 多舭纹; 滑行型; 浮筒; 圆底; 隧道型; V 型底; 其他
sv: Kajakskrovdesign: Deplacement; Platt botten; Hybrid; Flerknäcksspant; Planande; Ponton; Rundad; Tunnel; V-formad; Annat
ko: 카약 선체 디자인: 배수형; 플랫 보텀; 하이브리드; 멀티 차인; 플래닝; 폰툰; 라운드형; 터널형; V자형; 기타
pt-BR: Caiaque design do casco: Deslocamento; Fundo plano; Híbrido; Múltiplas arestas; Planeio; Pontão; Arredondado; Túnel; Em V; Outro
th: การออกแบบตัวเรือคายัก: แบบแหวกน้ำ; ท้องแบน; ไฮบริด; ท้องเรือแบบหลายเหลี่ยม; แบบเพลนนิ่ง; พอนทูน; ท้องกลม; ท้องอุโมงค์; รูปตัว V; อื่นๆ
cs: Návrh trupu kajaku: Výtlačný; Ploché dno; Hybridní; Vícehranný; Klouzavý; Pontonový; Oblý; Tunelový; Do V; Jiné
fi: Kajakin rungon muotoilu: Uppouma; Tasapohja; Hybridi; Monipalle; Plaanaava; Ponttooni; Pyöreä; Tunneli; V-muotoinen; Muu
pl: Konstrukcja kadłuba kajaka: Wypornościowy; Płaskodenny; Hybrydowy; Wielokątny (multi-chine); Ślizgowy; Pływakowy (pontoon); Zaokrąglony; Tunelowy; W kształcie V; Inny
nb: Kajakkens skrogdesign: Deplasement; Flatbunn; Hybrid; Flerknekkspant; Planende; Pongtong; Avrundet; Tunnel; V-formet; Annet
el: Σχεδιασμός γάστρας καγιάκ: Εκτοπίσματος; Επίπεδος πυθμένας; Υβριδικό; Multi-chine; Πλαναρίσματος; Πλωτήρας; Στρογγυλεμένο; Τούνελ; Σε σχήμα V; Άλλο
sk-SK: Konštrukcia trupu kajaku: Výtlačný; Ploché dno; Hybridný; Viacnásobné zalomenie; Klzákový; Pontónový; Zaoblený; Tunelový; V tvare V; Iné
ja: カヤックの船体設計: ディスプレイスメント; フラットボトム; ハイブリッド; マルチチャイン; プレーニング; ポンツーン; ラウンド; トンネル; V字型; その他
zh-TW: 獨木舟船體設計: 排水型; 平底; 混合型; 多脊線型; 滑行型; 浮筒型; 圓底; 隧道型; V 型; 其他
pt-PT: Design do casco do caiaque: Deslocamento; Fundo plano; Híbrido; Multiquinas; Planagem; Pontão; Arredondado; Túnel; Em V; Outro
hu: Kajak hajótest kialakítása: Kiszorításos; Lapos fenekű; Hibrid; Többtöréses; Sikló; Pontonos; Lekerekített; Alagút; V alakú; Egyéb
de: Rumpfdesign des Kajaks: Verdränger; Flacher Boden; Hybrid; Multiknickspant; Gleiter; Ponton; Abgerundet; Tunnel; V-förmig; Sonstige
it: Progettazione dello scafo del kayak: Dislocante; Fondo piatto; Ibrida; A spigoli multipli; Planante; A pontone; Arrotondata; A tunnel; A V; Altro
ru: Конструкция корпуса каяка: Водоизмещающий; Плоскодонный; Гибридный; Многоскуловый; Глиссирующий; Понтонный; Округлый; Тоннельный; V-образный; Другое
vi: Thiết kế thân thuyền kayak: Rẽ nước; Đáy phẳng; Lai; Đa góc (Multi-chine); Lướt sóng; Thuyền phao; Bo tròn; Đáy hầm; Đáy chữ V; Khác
en: Kayak hull design: Displacement; Flat bottom; Hybrid; Multi-chine; Planing; Pontoon; Rounded; Tunnel; V-shaped; Other
bg-BG: Дизайн на корпуса на каяка: Водоизместващ; Плоско дъно; Хибрид; С множество ръбове; Глисиращ; Понтон; Заоблен; Тунел; V-образен; Друго
nl: Kajak romp ontwerp: Waterverplaatsing; Platte bodem; Hybride; Meervoudige knikspant; Planerend; Ponton; Afgerond; Tunnel; V-vormig; Overig